Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1048.
do enact as follows:SB1048,11Section 1. 70.11 (4g) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1048,2,6270.11 (4g) Real property held for rehabilitation, redevelopment, or 3future construction and later sale to low-income persons lower income 4households. (intro.) Real property owned by a nonprofit organization described in 5section 501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code if all of the following requirements 6are fulfilled:SB1048,27Section 2. 70.11 (4g) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1048,2,12870.11 (4g) (a) The nonprofit organization holds the property for the purpose of 9rehabilitating an existing structure, redevelopment involving a structure, or 10constructing a new structure on the property for sale to low-income persons lower 11income households and persons having an income below the threshold described in 12par. (b) for use as a personal residence.SB1048,313Section 3. 70.11 (4g) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1048,3,21470.11 (4g) (b) The nonprofit organization offers low-income persons lower 15income households loans to purchase the property for which no interest is charged 16or the nonprofit organization is restricted to transferring the property to persons 1having an income that is less than 120 percent of the area median income, as 2determined under 42 USC 1437a, for the area where the property is located.SB1048,43Section 4. 70.11 (4g) (c) of the statutes is repealed.SB1048,54Section 5. Initial applicability.SB1048,3,65(1) This act first applies to the property tax assessments as of January 1, 62026.SB1048,3,77